Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 166.155 is amended to read:
166.155. (1) A person  commits [ the crime of intimidation ] a bias crime  in the second degree if
the person:
(a) Tampers or interferes with property, having no right to do  so nor reasonable ground to be-
lieve that the person has such right, with  the intent to cause substantial inconvenience to another
person because of the person’s perception  of the [ other’s] other person’s  race, color, religion,
gender identity, sexual orientation, disability or national origin;
(b) Intentionally subjects another  person to offensive physical contact  because of the person’s
perception of the [ other’s] other person’s  race, color,  religion,  gender identity, sexual orientation,
disability or national origin; or
(c) Intentionally,  because of the person’s perception of race, color, religion,  gender identity,
sexual orientation, disability or national origin of another  person  or of a member  of the [ other’s]
other person’s  family, subjects the other person to alarm by threatening:
(A) To inflict serious physical injury upon or to commit a  felony affecting the other person, or
a member of the  other  person’s family; or
(B) To cause substantial damage to the property of the  other person or of a member of the other
person’s family.
(2) [Intimidation] A bias crime  in the second degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) [For purposes of ] As used in  this section  and ORS 166.165 [,]:
(a) “Gender identity” means an individual’s gender-related identity, appearance,  ex-
pression or  behavior, regardless of whether the identity, appearance, expression or behavior
differs from that associated with the gender assigned to the individual at birth.
(b) “Property” means any tangible personal property or real property.
SECTION 2.  ORS 166.165 is amended to read:
166.165. [(1) Two or more persons acting together commit the crime of intimidation in the first  de-
gree, if the persons: ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 1
[(a)(A) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly cause physical  injury to another person because of
the actors’ perception of that person’s race, color, religion, sexual orientation,  disability or national
origin; or]
[(B) With criminal negligence cause physical injury to another person by means of a deadly weapon
because of the actors’ perception of that person’s race, color, religion, sexual  orientation, disability or
national origin; ]
[(b) Intentionally, because of the actors’ perception of another person’s race, color, religion,  sexual
orientation, disability or national origin, place another person in fear of imminent serious  physical in-
jury; or ]
[(c) Commit such acts as would constitute the crime of intimidation in the  second degree, if
undertaken by one person acting alone. ]
(1) A person commits a bias crime in the first degree if the person:
(a) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes  physical injury to another person be-
cause of the  person’s perception of the other person’s race, color, religion, gender identity,
sexual orientation, disability or national origin;
(b) With criminal negligence causes physical injury to another person by means of a
deadly weapon because of the person’s perception of the other person’s race, color, religion,
gender identity, sexual orientation, disability or national origin; or
(c) Intentionally, because of the person’s perception of another person’s race, color,  re-
ligion, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability or national origin, places another person
in fear of imminent serious physical injury.
(2) [Intimidation] A bias crime  in the first degree is a Class C felony.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 181A.225 is amended to read:
181A.225. (1) All law enforcement agencies shall report  to the Department of State Police sta-
tistics concerning crimes:
(a) As  directed by the department, for purposes of the Uniform Crime Reporting System of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(b) As otherwise directed by  the Governor concerning general criminal categories of criminal
activities but not individual criminal records.
(c) Motivated by prejudice based on the perceived  race, color, religion, national origin, sexual
orientation, [ marital status, political affiliation or beliefs, membership or activity in  or on behalf of a
labor organization or against a labor organization, physical or  mental ] disability[ , age, economic or
social status or citizenship ] or gender identity  of the victim.
(d) And other incidents arising out of  domestic disturbances under ORS 133.055 (2) and 133.310
(3).
(2) The department shall prepare:
(a) Quarterly and annual reports for the use of agencies reporting under subsection  (1) of this
section, and others having an interest therein;
(b) An annual public report of the statistics on the incidence of crime motivated  by prejudice
based on the perceived race, color, religion,  national origin, sexual orientation, [ marital status, pol-
itical affiliation or beliefs, membership or activity in or on behalf of  a labor organization or against
a labor organization, physical or mental ] disability[ , age, economic or social status or citizenship ] or
gender identity of the victim;
(c) Quarterly and annual reports of the statistics on  the incidence of crimes and incidents of
domestic disturbances; and
(d) Special reports as directed by the Governor.
(3)(a) The department shall report to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, contin-
ually and at least quarterly, all  primary data collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section.
(b) The data reported to, and maintained by, the commission under this subsection:
(A) Shall be used only for statistical purposes and not for any other purpose.
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 2
(B) Is exempt  from public disclosure if the data directly identifies any individual involved
in a bias crime.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, in the rules of the commission
concerning sentencing departure factors, shall include  gender identity as defined in ORS
166.155 as a characteristic of the victim constituting an aggravating factor when the char-
acteristic was the motivation, entirely or in part, for the commission of the crime.
SECTION 5.
(1)(a) No later than  July 1, 2020, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission,
in consultation with the Oregon District  Attorneys Association and the Department of State
Police, shall develop and  implement a standardized method for district attorneys to record
the data described in subsection (2) of this section and report the data to the commission.
(b) The commission shall  analyze the data reported under this section to identify gaps
or weaknesses  in the investigation, presentation, prosecution and sanctioning of crimes mo-
tivated by bias.
(2) The data  subject to recording and reporting under this section includes, at a mini-
mum, the following data  concerning any crime or alleged crime in which the bias of the actor
was, in whole or in part, a motivating factor in the commission of the crime or alleged crime:
(a) Charges presented to the district attorney for prosecution;
(b) Cases issued by the district attorney;
(c) Charges indicted;
(d) Sentencing enhancements requested;
(e) Sentences imposed, including conditions of supervision;
(f) Charges to which a defendant enters a plea of guilty or no contest; and
(g) Trial outcomes.
(3) No later than July 1, 2020, the district attorneys of Multnomah County and two addi-
tional counties identified by the  commission shall begin to record the data described in sub-
section (2) of this section. The counties shall report the data to  the commission using the
method identified in subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) The commission shall select  one or more statistical analysis methodologies, deter-
mined to be consistent with current best practices,  with which to analyze the data received
under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The commission shall analyze all data received under subsection (3) of this  section
using the selected methodology.
(5) No later than July 1, 2021,  the commission shall report on the analysis of the data
received under subsection (3) of this section to the Legislative Assembly in  the manner
provided under ORS 192.245.
(6) After  completing the report described in subsection (5) of this section, the commis-
sion, in consultation  with the Oregon District Attorneys Association and the Department of
State Police, shall make any necessary refinements to the data  reporting, recording and
analysis methodologies.
(7) No later than July  1, 2022, the district attorney of each county in this state shall re-
cord the data described in subsection (2) of this  section and report the data to the commis-
sion.
(8) The data reported to, and maintained by, the commission under this section:
(a) Shall be used only for statistical purposes and not for any other purpose.
(b) Is exempt from public disclosure if the data  directly identifies any individual involved
in the crime or alleged crime described in subsection (2) of this section.
(9) Any data recorded by a district attorney under this section that reveals  the identity
of any individual is exempt from public disclosure.
(10) The commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 6.
 Section 5 of this 2019 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1)(a) [ No later than July 1, 2020, ] The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, in consul-
tation with the Oregon District Attorneys Association and  the Department of State Police, shall
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 3
develop and implement a standardized method for district attorneys to record the data described  in
subsection (2) of this section and report the data to the commission.
(b) The commission shall analyze the data reported under this section  to identify gaps or
weaknesses in the investigation, presentation, prosecution and sanctioning of crimes motivated  by
bias.
(2) The data subject to recording and reporting under this section includes, at a minimum,  the
following data concerning any crime or alleged  crime in which the bias of the actor was, in whole
or in part, a motivating factor in the commission of the crime or alleged crime:
(a) Charges presented to the district attorney for prosecution;
(b) Cases issued by the district attorney;
(c) Charges indicted;
(d) Sentencing enhancements requested;
(e) Sentences imposed, including conditions of supervision;
(f) Charges to which a defendant enters a plea of guilty or no contest; and
(g) Trial outcomes.
[(3) No later than July 1, 2020, the district attorneys of Multnomah County and two additional
counties identified by the commission shall begin to record the data described in subsection  (2) of this
section. The counties shall report the data to the commission using the method identified in  subsection
(1) of this section. ]
[(4)(a) The commission shall select one or more statistical analysis  methodologies, determined to
be consistent with current best practices, with which to analyze the data received  under subsection (3)
of this section. ]
[(b) The commission shall analyze all data received under subsection (3) of this section using the
selected methodology. ]
[(5) No later than  July 1, 2021, the commission shall report on the analysis of the data received
under subsection (3) of this section to the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided  under ORS
192.245.]
[(6) After completing the report described in subsection (5)  of this section, the commission, in con-
sultation with  the Oregon District Attorneys Association and the Department of State Police, shall
make any necessary refinements to the data reporting, recording and analysis methodologies. ]
[(7)] (3) [ No later than July 1, 2022, ] The district attorney of  each county in this state shall re-
cord the data described in subsection (2) of this section and report the data to the commission.
[(8)] (4) The data reported to, and maintained by, the commission under this section:
(a) Shall be used only for statistical purposes and not for any other purpose.
(b) Is exempt from public disclosure if the  data directly identifies any individual involved in the
crime or alleged crime described in subsection (2) of this section.
[(9)] (5) Any data recorded by a district attorney under this section that reveals the identity  of
any individual is exempt from public disclosure.
[(10)] (6) The commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
NOTE:
 Section 7 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 8. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Bias crime” means the commission, attempted  commission or alleged commission
of an offense described in ORS 166.155 or 166.165.
(b) “Bias incident” means a person’s  hostile expression of animus toward another person,
relating to the other person’s perceived race, color, religion,  gender identity, sexual orien-
tation, disability or national origin, of which criminal investigation or  prosecution is impos-
sible or inappropriate. “Bias incident” does not include any incident in which probable  cause
of the commission of a crime is established by the investigating law enforcement officer.
(c) “Hate crimes hotline” means the  telephone hotline established by the Department of
Justice under subsection (3) of this section.
(d) “Local victims’ services” means services  provided to a victim of a bias crime or bias
incident, including but not limited to  safety planning, trauma management and data report-
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 4
ing, by an entity located in the  same geographic area as the law enforcement agency that
responds to the bias crime or bias incident.
(2)(a) A  law enforcement agency that responds to a report of a bias incident shall refer
the victim of the bias incident to qualifying local victims’ services.
(b) The Department of Justice shall by rule designate qualifying local victims’ services.
(c) If qualifying local victims’ services are unavailable,  the law enforcement agency shall
refer the victim of the bias incident to the hate crimes hotline.
(3) The Department of Justice shall establish a staffed hate crimes telephone hotline
dedicated to assisting the victims of bias crimes and bias incidents.
(4) There is created in the Department of Justice the position of Hate Crimes Response
Coordinator. The Hate Crimes Response Coordinator shall:
(a) Respond to all reports of bias crimes and  bias incidents made to the hate crimes
hotline.
(b) Provide assistance to victims of bias crimes and bias incidents that is  culturally
competent and designed to reduce the effects of trauma, prevent further trauma and reach
a diverse community.
(c) Assist with safety planning for victims of bias crimes and bias incidents.
(d) Coordinate with local nongovernmental organizations and service providers in assist-
ing victims of bias crimes and bias incidents.
(e) Develop training for nongovernmental organizations and service  providers to stand-
ardize methods for assisting victims of bias crimes and bias incidents.
(5)(a) The Department of Justice shall:
(A) In coordination with  the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, develop a standardized
intake process for all reports of bias crimes and bias incidents made to the department.
(B) Collect all data possible concerning the character, location and impacted  protected
class of any bias crime or bias incident reported to the department.
(C) Report to the commission continually  and at least quarterly all data collected pur-
suant to this subsection.
(b) The data reported to the commission under this subsection may not contain infor-
mation that reveals the identity of any individual.
(6) Any data collected by the Department of Justice under this  section that reveals the
identity of any individual is exempt from public disclosure.
(7) The Department of Justice may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 9.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Bias crime” means the commission, attempted  commission or alleged commission
of an offense described in ORS 166.155 or 166.165.
(b) “Bias incident” means a person’s  hostile expression of animus toward another person,
relating to the other person’s perceived race, color, religion,  gender identity, sexual orien-
tation, disability or national origin, of which criminal investigation or  prosecution is impos-
sible or inappropriate. “Bias incident” does not include any incident in which probable  cause
of the commission of a crime is established by the investigating law enforcement officer.
(2) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall review all data pertaining  to bias
crimes and bias incidents submitted to the commission:
(a) By district attorneys under section 5 of this 2019 Act;
(b) By the Department of State Police under ORS 181A.225; and
(c) By the Department of Justice under section 8 of this 2019 Act.
(3) The commission  shall select one or more statistical analysis methodologies, deter-
mined to be consistent with  current best practices, with which to analyze the data described
in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) No later than July 1, 2020, and at least annually  thereafter, the commission shall re-
port the results of the data analysis to the Governor,  the Legislative Assembly, the Attorney
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 5
General, the Oregon District Attorneys Association, the Department of State Police and  the
Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the data described  in subsection
(2) of this section shall be made publicly accessible to the fullest extent possible  under state
and federal law.
(6) The commission may use the data described in subsection (2)  of this section only for
statistical purposes and not for any other purpose.
(7) Any data  described in subsection (2) of this section that reveals the identity of any
individual is exempt from public disclosure.
(8) The commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
NOTE:
 Section 10 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 11.  ORS 90.396 is amended to read:
90.396. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, after  at least 24 hours’ written
notice specifying the acts and omissions constituting  the cause and specifying the date and time of
the termination, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement and take  possession as provided
in ORS 105.105 to 105.168, if:
(a) The tenant, someone in the tenant’s control or the tenant’s pet  seriously threatens to inflict
substantial personal injury,  or inflicts any substantial personal injury, upon a person on the prem-
ises other than the tenant;
(b) The tenant or someone in the tenant’s control recklessly endangers  a person on the premises
other than the tenant by creating a serious risk of substantial personal injury;
(c) The tenant,  someone in the tenant’s control or the tenant’s pet inflicts any substantial per-
sonal injury upon a neighbor living in the immediate vicinity of the premises;
(d) The tenant or someone in the tenant’s control intentionally inflicts any substantial damage
to the premises or the tenant’s pet inflicts  substantial damage to the premises on more than one
occasion;
(e)(A) The tenant  intentionally provided substantial false information on the application for the
tenancy within the past year;
(B) The  false information was with regard to a criminal conviction of the tenant that would have
been material to the landlord’s acceptance of the application; and
(C) The landlord terminates the  rental agreement within 30 days after discovering the falsity
of the information; or
(f) The tenant, someone in the  tenant’s control or the tenant’s pet commits any act that is out-
rageous in the extreme, on the premises or in the immediate vicinity  of the premises. For purposes
of this paragraph, an act is outrageous in the  extreme if the act is not described in paragraphs (a)
to (e) of this subsection, but is similar in degree and is one that a reasonable  person in that com-
munity would consider to be so offensive as to warrant termination of the tenancy  within 24 hours,
considering the seriousness of the  act or the risk to others. An act that is outrageous in the extreme
is more extreme or serious than  an act that warrants a 30-day termination under ORS 90.392. Acts
that are “outrageous in  the extreme” include, but are not limited to, the following acts by a person:
(A) Prostitution, commercial sexual solicitation or promoting prostitution, as described in  ORS
167.007, 167.008 and 167.012;
(B) Unlawful manufacture, delivery or possession of a  controlled substance, as defined in ORS
475.005;
(C) Manufacture of a cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475B.015, unless  the person man-
ufacturing the cannabinoid extract holds a license issued under ORS 475B.090 or  is registered under
ORS 475B.840;
(D) [ Intimidation] A bias crime , as described in ORS 166.155 and 166.165; or
(E) Burglary as described in ORS 164.215 and 164.225.
(2) If the  cause for a termination notice given pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is based
upon the acts of the tenant’s pet, the tenant may cure the cause and  avoid termination of the
tenancy by removing the pet from the premises  prior to the end of the notice period. The notice
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 6
must describe the right of the tenant to cure the cause. If  the tenant returns the pet to the premises
at any time after having cured the violation, the landlord,  after at least 24 hours’ written notice
specifying  the  subsequent presence of the offending pet, may terminate the rental agreement and
take possession as provided in ORS 105.105 to 105.168. The tenant does not  have a right to cure this
subsequent violation.
(3) For purposes of  subsection (1) of this section, someone is in the tenant’s control if that per-
son enters or remains on the premises with the tenant’s permission or consent  after the tenant
reasonably knows or  should know of that person’s act or likelihood to commit any act of the type
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) An act  can be proven to be outrageous in the extreme even if the act is one that does not
violate a criminal statute. Notwithstanding  the references to criminal statutes in subsection (1)(f)
of this section, the landlord’s burden of proof in an action for possession under  subsection (1) of this
section is the civil standard of proof by a preponderance of the evidence.
(5) If a good faith effort by a  landlord to terminate the tenancy under subsection (1)(f) of this
section and to recover possession of the rental unit under ORS 105.105  to 105.168 fails by decision
of the court, the landlord may  not be found in violation of any state statute or local ordinance re-
quiring the landlord to remove that tenant upon threat of  fine, abatement or forfeiture as long as
the landlord continues to make a good faith effort to terminate the tenancy.
SECTION 12.  ORS 137.225, as amended by section 12, chapter  120, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
137.225. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, at any time after the lapse
of three years from  the date of pronouncement of judgment, any defendant who has fully complied
with and performed the sentence of the court and whose conviction is described in subsection  (5)
of this section by motion may apply to the court where  the conviction was entered for entry of an
order setting aside the conviction. A person who  is still under supervision, or who is still
incarcerated, as part of the sentence for the offense that is the  subject of the motion has not fully
complied with or performed the sentence of the court.
(b) At  any time after the lapse of one year from the date of any arrest, issuance of a criminal
citation or criminal charge, if no accusatory instrument was filed, or at any time after  an acquittal
or a dismissal  of the charge, the arrested, cited or charged person may apply to the court that would
have jurisdiction over the crime for which the person  was arrested, cited or charged, for entry of
an order setting aside the record of the arrest, citation or charge. For the purpose of computing  the
one-year period, time  during which the person has secreted himself or herself within or without this
state is not included.
(c) A person whose sentence of probation was  revoked may not apply to the court for entry of
an order setting aside the  conviction for which the person was sentenced to probation for a period
of 10 years from the date of revocation.
(2)(a) A copy of  the motion and a full set of the defendant’s fingerprints shall be served upon
the office of the prosecuting attorney who prosecuted  the crime or violation, or who had authority
to prosecute the charge if there was no accusatory instrument filed, and opportunity shall  be given
to contest the motion. The fingerprint card with the notation “motion for setting aside conviction,”
or “motion for setting aside arrest, citation or  charge record” as the case may be, shall be for-
warded to the Department of State Police.  Information resulting from the fingerprint search along
with the fingerprint card shall be returned to the prosecuting attorney.
(b) When a prosecuting  attorney is served with a copy of a motion to set aside a conviction
under this section, the prosecuting attorney shall  provide a copy of the motion and notice of the
hearing date to the victim, if any, of the crime by mailing a copy  of the motion and notice to the
victim’s last-known address.
(c) When a person makes a motion under subsection (1)(a) of this section,  the person must pay
a fee of $80 to the Department of State Police. The  person shall attach a certified check payable to
the Department of State Police in the amount of $80 to the  fingerprint card that is served upon the
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 7
prosecuting attorney. The  office of the prosecuting attorney shall forward the check with the
fingerprint card to the Department of State Police.
(d) In addition to the  fee established under paragraph (c) of this subsection, when a person
makes a motion under  subsection (1)(a) of this section the person must pay the filing fee established
under ORS 21.135.
(e) The prosecuting attorney may not charge the defendant a fee  for performing the require-
ments described in this section.
(3) Upon hearing the motion, the court may require the filing of such affidavits and may require
the taking of such proofs as the court  deems proper. The court shall allow the victim to make a
statement at the hearing. Except  as otherwise provided in subsection (12) of this section, if the court
determines that the circumstances  and behavior of the applicant from the date of conviction, or from
the date of arrest, citation or charge as the case may be, to  the date of the hearing on the motion
warrant setting aside the conviction, or the arrest, citation or charge record as the case  may be,
the court shall enter an appropriate order that shall state the original arrest or citation charge and
the conviction charge, if any and if different from the original, date of charge,  submitting agency
and disposition. The order shall further state that positive identification has been established  by the
Department of State Police and further identified as to Department of State Police number or  sub-
mitting agency number. Upon the entry of the order, the applicant for purposes of  the law shall
be deemed not to have been previously convicted, or arrested, cited or  charged as the case may be,
and the court shall issue an order sealing the record of conviction and other official records  in the
case, including the records  of arrest, citation or charge whether or not the arrest, citation or charge
resulted in a further criminal proceeding.
(4) The clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the order to such agencies as directed
by the court. A certified copy must be sent to  the Department of Corrections when the person has
been in the custody  of the Department of Corrections. Upon entry of the order, the conviction, ar-
rest, citation, charge or other proceeding shall be deemed not to have occurred, and the applicant
may answer accordingly any questions relating to its occurrence.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section apply to a conviction for:
(a) A Class B felony, except for  a violation of ORS 166.429 or any crime classified as a person
felony as that term is defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, only if:
(A)(i) Twenty years or more have  elapsed from the date of the conviction sought to be set aside
or of the release of the person  from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, which-
ever is later; and
(ii) The person has not been  convicted of, arrested or criminally cited for or charged with any
other offense, excluding motor vehicle violations, after the date the person was convicted of the of-
fense sought to  be set aside. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a conviction, arrest, ci-
tation or charge that has been set  aside under this section shall be considered for the purpose of
determining whether this subparagraph is applicable; or
(B) The Class B felony is described in paragraphs (b) to (d) of this subsection.
(b) Any misdemeanor, Class C felony or felony punishable as a misdemeanor  pursuant to ORS
161.705.
(c) An offense constituting a violation under state law or local ordinance.
(d) An offense committed before January 1, 1972, that, if committed after that date, would qualify
for an order under this section.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of  this
section do not apply to a conviction for:
(a) Criminal  mistreatment in the second degree under ORS 163.200 if the victim at the time of
the crime was 65 years of age or older.
(b) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree under ORS 163.205 if the victim at  the time of the
crime was 65  years of age or older, or when the offense constitutes child abuse as defined in ORS
419B.005.
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 8
(c) Endangering the welfare of a minor under ORS  163.575 (1)(a), when the offense constitutes
child abuse as defined in ORS 419B.005.
(d) Criminally negligent homicide under ORS  163.145, when that offense was punishable as a
Class C felony.
(e) Assault in the third degree under ORS 163.165 (1)(h).
(f) Any sex crime, unless:
(A) The sex crime is listed in ORS 163A.140 (1)(a) and:
(i) The person has been relieved of the  obligation to report as a sex offender pursuant to a court
order entered under ORS 163A.145 or 163A.150; and
(ii) The person has not been convicted of, found guilty except for insanity of  or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the  juvenile court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; or
(B) The sex crime constitutes a Class C felony and:
(i) The person was under 16 years of age at the time of the offense;
(ii) The person is:
(I) Less than two years and 180 days older than the victim; or
(II) At least two years and 180 days older,  but less than three years and 180 days older, than
the victim and the court finds that setting aside  the conviction is in the interests of justice and of
benefit to the person and the community;
(iii) The  victim’s lack of consent was due solely to incapacity to consent by reason of being less
than a specified age;
(iv) The victim was at least 12 years of age at the time of the offense;
(v) The person has not been convicted of,  found guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the  juvenile court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; and
(vi) Each conviction or finding described in this subparagraph involved the same victim.
(7) Notwithstanding  subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1) of this section
do not apply to:
(a) A conviction for a state or municipal traffic offense.
(b) A person convicted, within the  10-year period immediately preceding the filing of the motion
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, of any other offense,  excluding motor vehicle violations,
whether or not  the other conviction is for conduct associated with the same criminal episode that
caused the arrest, citation, charge or conviction that is sought to  be set aside. A single violation,
other than a motor vehicle violation, within the  last 10 years is not a conviction under this sub-
section. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, a conviction that has been set aside under
this section shall be considered for the purpose of determining whether this paragraph  is applicable.
(c) A person who at  the time the motion authorized by subsection (1) of this section is pending
before the court is under charge of commission of any crime.
(8) The provisions of subsection (1)(b) of this section do not apply to:
(a) A person arrested or criminally  cited for or charged with an offense within the three-year
period immediately preceding  the filing of the motion for any offense, excluding motor vehicle vio-
lations, and excluding arrests, citations or charges for conduct associated with the  same criminal
episode that caused the arrest, citation or charge that is sought to be set aside. An  arrest, citation
or charge that has been set  aside under this section may not be considered for the purpose of de-
termining whether this paragraph is applicable.
(b) An arrest or citation for  driving while under the influence of intoxicants if the charge is
dismissed as a result of the person’s successful completion of a diversion agreement  described in
ORS 813.200.
(9) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section apply to  convictions, arrests, citations and
charges that occurred before, as  well as those that occurred after, September 9, 1971. There is no
time limit for making an application.
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 9
(10) For purposes of any civil action in which  truth is an element of a claim for relief or affir-
mative defense, the provisions of subsection (3) of this section providing  that the conviction, arrest,
citation, charge or other proceeding be deemed not to have occurred do not apply and a  party may
apply to the court for  an order requiring disclosure of the official records in the case as may be
necessary in the interest of justice.
(11) Upon motion of any prosecutor or defendant in a case involving records sealed  under this
section, supported by affidavit showing  good cause, the court with jurisdiction may order the reo-
pening and disclosure of any records  sealed under this section for the limited purpose of assisting
the investigation of the movant. However, such an order has no other  effect on the orders setting
aside the conviction or the arrest, citation or charge record.
(12) Unless the court makes written findings by clear and convincing evidence that granting  the
motion would not be in the best interests of justice, the court shall  grant the motion and enter an
order as provided in subsection (3) of this section if the defendant has been convicted of one  of the
following crimes and is otherwise eligible for relief under this section:
(a) Abandonment of a child, ORS 163.535.
(b) Attempted assault in the second degree, ORS 163.175.
(c) Assault in the third degree, ORS 163.165.
(d) Coercion, ORS 163.275.
(e) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree, ORS 163.205.
(f) Attempted escape in the first degree, ORS 162.165.
(g) Incest, ORS 163.525, if the victim was at least 18 years of age.
(h) [ Intimidation] A bias crime  in the first degree, ORS 166.165.
(i) Attempted kidnapping in the second degree, ORS 163.225.
(j) Attempted robbery in the second degree, ORS 164.405.
(k) Robbery in the third degree, ORS 164.395.
(L) Supplying contraband, ORS 162.185.
(m) Unlawful use of a weapon, ORS 166.220.
(13) As used in this section, “sex crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 137.712 is amended to read:
137.712. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 137.700 and 137.707,  when a person is convicted of
manslaughter in the second degree as defined in ORS 163.125, assault  in the second degree as de-
fined in ORS 163.175 (1)(b), kidnapping in the second degree as defined  in ORS 163.225, rape in the
second degree as defined in ORS 163.365, sodomy in  the second degree as defined in ORS 163.395,
unlawful sexual penetration in the  second degree as defined in ORS 163.408, sexual abuse in the first
degree as defined in ORS 163.427 (1)(a)(A) or  robbery in the second degree as defined in ORS
164.405, the court may impose a sentence  according to the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission that is less than the minimum  sentence that otherwise may be required by ORS 137.700
or 137.707 if the court, on the record at  sentencing, makes the findings set forth in subsection (2)
of this section and finds that a substantial and compelling reason under the rules of the  Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission  justifies the lesser sentence. When the court imposes a sentence under
this subsection, the person is eligible for a reduction in the sentence  as provided in ORS 421.121
and any other statute.
(b) In order to make a dispositional departure under this section, the court must  make the fol-
lowing additional findings on the record:
(A) There exists a substantial and compelling reason  not relied upon in paragraph (a) of this
subsection;
(B) A sentence  of probation will be more effective than a prison term in reducing the risk of
offender recidivism; and
(C) A sentence of probation will better serve to protect society.
(2) A conviction is subject to subsection (1) of this section only if  the sentencing court finds on
the record by a preponderance of the evidence:
(a) If the conviction is for manslaughter in the second degree:
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 10
(A) That the victim was a  dependent person as defined in ORS 163.205 who was at least 18 years
of age;
(B) That the defendant is the mother or father of the victim;
(C) That the death of  the victim was the result of an injury or illness that was not caused by
the defendant;
(D) That the defendant treated the injury or illness solely by  spiritual treatment in accordance
with the religious beliefs or practices of  the defendant and based on a good faith belief that spiritual
treatment would bring about the victim’s recovery from the injury or illness;
(E) That no other person previously under the defendant’s care has died or sustained significant
physical injury as a result of or despite the  use of spiritual treatment, regardless of whether the
spiritual treatment was used alone or in conjunction with medical care; and
(F) That the defendant does  not have a previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (4)
of this section or for criminal mistreatment in the second degree.
(b) If the conviction is for assault in the second degree:
(A) That the victim was not physically injured by means of a deadly weapon;
(B) That the victim did not suffer a significant physical injury; and
(C) That the defendant does not have a previous conviction for  a crime listed in subsection (4)
of this section.
(c) If the conviction is for kidnapping in the second degree:
(A) That the victim was at least 12 years of age at the time the crime was committed; and
(B) That the defendant does not have  a previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (4)
of this section.
(d) If the conviction is for robbery in the second degree:
(A) That the victim did not suffer a significant physical injury;
(B) That, if the defendant represented by words or conduct that  the defendant was armed with
a dangerous weapon, the representation did not reasonably put the victim in  fear of imminent sig-
nificant physical injury;
(C) That, if the defendant represented by words or conduct that  the defendant was armed with
a deadly weapon, the representation did not reasonably put the victim in fear  of imminent physical
injury; and
(D) That the defendant does not have a previous  conviction for a crime listed in subsection (4)
of this section.
(e) If the conviction is for rape in the second degree, sodomy  in the second degree or sexual
abuse in the first degree:
(A) That the victim was at least 12 years of age, but under 14 years  of age, at the time of the
offense;
(B) That the defendant does not have a prior conviction for a crime listed  in subsection (4) of
this section;
(C) That the defendant has not been previously found to be within the  jurisdiction of a juvenile
court for an act that would have been  a felony sexual offense if the act had been committed by an
adult;
(D) That the defendant was no more than five years older than the  victim at the time of the
offense;
(E) That the offense did not involve sexual contact with any minor other than the victim; and
(F) That the victim’s lack of consent  was due solely to incapacity to consent by reason of being
under 18 years of age at the time of the offense.
(f) If the conviction is for unlawful sexual penetration in the second degree:
(A) That the victim was 12 years of age or older at the time of the offense;
(B) That the defendant does  not have a prior conviction for a crime listed in subsection (4) of
this section;
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 11
(C) That the defendant has not been previously found to be within the  jurisdiction of a juvenile
court for an act that would have been a felony sexual offense if  the act had been committed by an
adult;
(D) That the defendant was no more  than five years older than the victim at the time of the
offense;
(E) That the offense did not involve sexual contact with any minor other than the victim;
(F) That the victim’s lack of consent  was due solely to incapacity to consent by reason of being
under 18 years of age at the time of the offense; and
(G) That the object used to commit the unlawful sexual penetration  was the hand or any part
thereof of the defendant.
(3) In making the findings required by subsections (1) and (2) of this  section, the court may
consider any evidence presented at trial and  may receive and consider any additional relevant in-
formation offered by either party at sentencing.
(4) The crimes  to which subsection (2)(a)(F), (b)(C), (c)(B), (d)(D), (e)(B) and (f)(B) of this section
refer are:
(a) A crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2) or 137.707 (4);
(b) Escape in the first degree, as defined in ORS 162.165;
(c) Aggravated murder, as defined in ORS 163.095;
(d) Criminally negligent homicide, as defined in ORS 163.145;
(e) Assault in the third degree, as defined in ORS 163.165;
(f) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree, as defined in ORS 163.205 (1)(b)(A);
(g) Rape in the third degree, as defined in ORS 163.355;
(h) Sodomy in the third degree, as defined in ORS 163.385;
(i) Sexual abuse in the second degree, as defined in ORS 163.425;
(j) Stalking, as defined in ORS 163.732;
(k) Burglary in the first degree, as defined in ORS 164.225, when it is classified  as a person
felony under the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission;
(L) Arson in the first degree, as defined in ORS 164.325;
(m) Robbery in the third degree, as defined in ORS 164.395;
(n) [ Intimidation] A bias crime  in the first degree, as defined in ORS 166.165;
(o) Promoting prostitution, as defined in ORS 167.012; and
(p) An attempt or solicitation to commit any Class A or B felony listed in paragraphs  (a) to (L)
of this subsection.
(5) Notwithstanding  ORS 137.545 (5)(b), if a person sentenced to probation under this section
violates a condition of probation by committing a new crime, the court shall  revoke the probation
and impose the presumptive sentence of imprisonment under the rules of the Oregon  Criminal Jus-
tice Commission.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Conviction” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) A juvenile court adjudication  finding a person within the court’s jurisdiction under ORS
419C.005, if the person was at least 15 years of age at the time the  person committed the offense
that brought the person within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. “Conviction” does not  include
a juvenile court adjudication described in  this subparagraph if the person successfully asserted the
defense set forth in ORS 419C.522.
(B) A conviction in another jurisdiction for a crime that if  committed in this state would con-
stitute a crime listed in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) “Previous conviction”  means a conviction that was entered prior to imposing sentence on the
current crime provided that the prior conviction is based on a crime committed in a separate crim-
inal episode. “Previous conviction” does not include a conviction for a Class C felony, including  an
attempt or  solicitation to commit a Class B felony, or a misdemeanor, unless the conviction was
entered within the 10-year period immediately preceding the date  on which the current crime was
committed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 12
(c) “Significant physical injury” means a physical injury that:
(A) Creates a risk of death that is not a remote risk;
(B) Causes a serious and temporary disfigurement;
(C) Causes a protracted disfigurement; or
(D) Causes a prolonged impairment of health or the function of any bodily organ.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 163.707 is amended to read:
163.707. (1) A motor vehicle used  by the owner in a drive-by shooting is subject to civil in rem
forfeiture.
(2) Seizure and forfeiture proceedings under this section shall be conducted in  accordance with
ORS chapter 131A.
(3) As used in this  section, “drive-by shooting” means discharge of a firearm from a motor ve-
hicle while committing or attempting to commit:
(a) Aggravated murder under ORS 163.095;
(b) Murder under ORS 163.115;
(c) Manslaughter in any degree under ORS 163.118 or 163.125;
(d) Assault in any degree under ORS 163.160, 163.165, 163.175 or 163.185;
(e) Menacing under ORS 163.190;
(f) Recklessly endangering another person under ORS 163.195;
(g) Assaulting a public safety officer under ORS 163.208; or
(h) [ Intimidation] A bias crime  in any degree under ORS 166.155 or 166.165.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 166.715 is amended to read:
166.715. As used in ORS 166.715 to 166.735, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Documentary material” means any book, paper, document, writing, drawing,  graph, chart,
photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer printout, other data  compilation from
which information can be obtained or from which information can be translated into  usable form,
or other tangible item.
(2) “Enterprise” includes any individual,  sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, business
trust or other profit or nonprofit legal entity, and  includes any union, association or group of indi-
viduals associated in fact although not  a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and gov-
ernmental and nongovernmental entities.
(3) “Investigative agency” means the Department of Justice or any district attorney.
(4) “Pattern of racketeering  activity” means engaging in at least two incidents of racketeering
activity that have the same  or similar intents, results, accomplices, victims or methods of commis-
sion or otherwise are interrelated by distinguishing characteristics, including  a nexus to the same
enterprise, and are not isolated incidents, provided at  least one of such incidents occurred after
November 1, 1981, and that the last of  such incidents occurred within five years after a prior inci-
dent of racketeering activity. Notwithstanding  ORS 131.505 to 131.525 or 419A.190 or any other
provision of law providing that a previous prosecution is a bar to  a subsequent prosecution, conduct
that constitutes an incident of racketeering activity may be used to establish a pattern  of
racketeering activity without  regard to whether the conduct previously has been the subject of a
criminal prosecution or conviction or a juvenile court adjudication, unless  the prosecution resulted
in an acquittal or the adjudication resulted  in entry of an order finding the youth not to be within
the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
(5) “Person” means  any individual or entity capable of holding a legal or beneficial interest in
real or personal property.
(6) “Racketeering activity” includes conduct of a person committed both  before and after the
person attains the age of 18 years, and means to commit,  to attempt to commit, to conspire to
commit, or to solicit, coerce or intimidate another person to commit:
(a) Any conduct that constitutes a crime, as defined in ORS 161.515, under any  of the following
provisions of the Oregon Revised Statutes:
(A) ORS 59.005 to 59.505, 59.710 to 59.830, 59.991 and 59.995, relating to securities;
(B) ORS 162.015, 162.025 and 162.065 to 162.085, relating to bribery and perjury;
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 13
(C) ORS 162.235, 162.265 to 162.305, 162.325, 162.335, 162.355 and 162.365, relating to obstructing
governmental  administration;
(D) ORS 162.405 to 162.425, relating to abuse of public office;
(E) ORS 162.455, relating to interference with legislative operation;
(F) ORS 163.095 to 163.115, 163.118, 163.125 and 163.145, relating to criminal homicide;
(G) ORS 163.160 to 163.205, relating to assault and related offenses;
(H) ORS 163.225 and 163.235, relating to kidnapping;
(I) ORS 163.275, relating to coercion;
(J) ORS 163.665 to 163.693, relating to sexual conduct of children;
(K) ORS  164.015, 164.043, 164.045, 164.055, 164.057, 164.075 to 164.095, 164.098, 164.125, 164.135,
164.140, 164.215, 164.225 and 164.245 to 164.270, relating to  theft, burglary, criminal trespass and
related offenses;
(L) ORS 164.315 to 164.335, relating to arson and related offenses;
(M) ORS 164.345 to 164.365, relating to criminal mischief;
(N) ORS 164.395 to 164.415, relating to robbery;
(O) ORS 164.865, 164.875 and 164.868 to  164.872, relating to unlawful recording or labeling of a
recording;
(P) ORS 165.007 to 165.022,  165.032 to 165.042 and 165.055 to 165.070, relating to forgery and
related offenses;
(Q) ORS 165.080 to 165.109, relating to business and commercial offenses;
(R) ORS 165.540 and 165.555, relating to communication crimes;
(S) ORS 166.180, 166.190, 166.220, 166.250, 166.270, 166.275, 166.410, 166.450 and 166.470, relating
to firearms and other weapons;
(T) ORS  164.377 (2) to (4), as punishable under ORS 164.377 (5)(b), 167.007 to 167.017, 167.057,
167.062 to 167.080, 167.090, 167.122 to 167.137, 167.147, 167.164, 167.167, 167.212, 167.355,  167.365,
167.370, 167.428, 167.431 and 167.439, relating to prostitution, obscenity, sexual conduct, gambling,
computer crimes involving the Oregon State  Lottery, animal fighting, forcible recovery of a fighting
bird and related offenses;
(U) ORS 171.990, relating to legislative witnesses;
(V) ORS 260.575 and 260.665, relating to election offenses;
(W) ORS 314.075, relating to income tax;
(X) ORS 180.440 (2) and 180.486 (2) and ORS  chapter 323, relating to cigarette and tobacco
products taxes and the directories developed under ORS 180.425 and 180.477;
(Y) ORS 411.630, 411.675, 411.690 and 411.840,  relating to public assistance payments or medical
assistance benefits, and ORS 411.990 (2) and (3);
(Z) ORS 462.140, 462.415 and 462.420 to 462.520, relating to racing;
(AA)  ORS  463.995, relating to entertainment wrestling and unarmed combat sports, as defined
in ORS 463.015;
(BB) ORS 471.305, 471.360, 471.392 to 471.400,  471.403, 471.404, 471.405, 471.425, 471.442, 471.445,
471.446, 471.485, 471.490 and 471.675, relating to alcoholic  liquor, and any of the provisions of ORS
chapter 471 relating to licenses issued under the Liquor Control Act;
(CC) ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, relating to marijuana items as defined in ORS 475B.015;
(DD) ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, relating to controlled substances;
(EE) ORS 480.070, 480.210, 480.215, 480.235 and 480.265, relating to explosives;
(FF) ORS 819.010, 819.040, 822.100, 822.135 and 822.150, relating to motor vehicles;
(GG) ORS 658.452 or 658.991 (2) to (4), relating to labor contractors;
(HH) ORS chapter 706, relating to banking law administration;
(II) ORS chapter 714, relating to branch banking;
(JJ) ORS chapter 716, relating to mutual savings banks;
(KK) ORS chapter 723, relating to credit unions;
(LL) ORS chapter 726, relating to pawnbrokers;
(MM) ORS 166.382 and 166.384, relating to destructive devices;
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 14
(NN) ORS 165.074;
(OO) ORS 86A.095 to 86A.198, relating to mortgage bankers and mortgage brokers;
(PP) ORS chapter 496, 497 or 498, relating to wildlife;
(QQ) ORS 163.355 to 163.427, relating to sexual offenses;
(RR) ORS 166.015, relating to riot;
(SS) ORS 166.155 and 166.165, relating to [ intimidation] bias crimes ;
(TT) ORS chapter 696, relating to real estate and escrow;
(UU) ORS chapter 704, relating to outfitters and guides;
(VV) ORS 165.692, relating to making a false claim for health care payment;
(WW) ORS 162.117, relating to public investment fraud;
(XX) ORS 164.170 or 164.172;
(YY) ORS 647.140, 647.145 or 647.150, relating to trademark counterfeiting;
(ZZ) ORS 164.886;
(AAA) ORS 167.312 and 167.388;
(BBB) ORS 164.889;
(CCC) ORS 165.800; or
(DDD) ORS 163.263, 163.264 or 163.266.
(b) Any conduct defined as “racketeering activity” under 18 U.S.C. 1961 (1)(B), (C), (D) and (E).
(7) “Unlawful debt” means any money or  other thing of value constituting principal or interest
of a debt that is  legally unenforceable in the state in whole or in part because the debt was incurred
or contracted:
(a) In violation of any one of the following:
(A) ORS chapter 462, relating to racing;
(B) ORS 167.108 to 167.164, relating to gambling; or
(C) ORS 82.010 to 82.170, relating to interest and usury.
(b) In gambling activity  in violation of federal law or in the business of lending money at a rate
usurious under federal or state law.
(8) Notwithstanding contrary provisions in  ORS 174.060, when this section references a statute
in the Oregon Revised Statutes  that is substantially different in the nature of its essential provisions
from what the statute was when this section  was enacted, the reference shall extend to and include
amendments to the statute.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 30.198 is amended to read:
30.198. (1) Irrespective of any criminal prosecution  or the result thereof, any person injured by
a violation of ORS 166.155 or 166.165 shall have  a civil action to secure an injunction, damages or
other appropriate relief against any [ and all persons ] person whose actions are unlawful under  ORS
166.155 and 166.165.
(2) Upon prevailing in such action, the plaintiff may recover:
(a) Both special and general damages, including damages for emotional distress; and
(b) Punitive damages.
(3) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees  to the prevailing plaintiff in an action under
this section. The court may award reasonable attorney  fees and expert witness fees incurred by a
defendant who prevails in the action  if the court determines that the plaintiff had no objectively
reasonable basis for asserting a claim or no reasonable  basis for appealing an adverse decision of
a trial court.
(4) The parent, parents or  legal guardian of an unemancipated minor shall be liable for any
judgment recovered against such minor under this section, in an amount not to exceed $5,000.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 30.200 is amended to read:
30.200. If any district attorney has reasonable cause to believe  that any person [ or group of
persons] is engaged in  violation of ORS 166.155 or 166.165, the district attorney may bring a civil
claim for relief in the appropriate court, setting forth facts pertaining to such violation, and  request
such relief as may be necessary to restrain  or prevent such violation. Any claim for relief under this
section does not prevent any person from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 15
SECTION 17a. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the limitation on
expenditures established by  section 3 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5515), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from federal funds collected  or received by the Department of Justice for the Crime
Victim and Survivor  Services Division is increased by $201,380, for the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 17b. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (4), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5515), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for Crime  Victim and
Survivor Services is increased by $46,453, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions  of
this 2019 Act.
SECTION 17c. In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $235,476, for the  purpose of carrying out the pro-
visions of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 18. Section 4 of this 2019 Act and the amendments  to ORS 30.198, 30.200, 90.396,
137.225, 137.712, 163.707, 166.155, 166.165 and 166.715 by sections 1, 2 and 11 to 17 of this 2019
Act apply to conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 19. (1)(a) Sections 5, 8 and 9 of  this 2019 Act become operative on January 1,
2020.
(b) The Department of Justice and the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission may  take
any action before the operative date specified in paragraph (a) of this  subsection that is
necessary to enable the department or commission  to exercise, on and after the operative
date specified in paragraph (a)  of this subsection, all of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the department or commission by sections 5, 8 and 9 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The amendments to section 5 of this 2019 Act by section 6 of  this 2019 Act become
operative on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 20. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 16
Passed by Senate June 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 577 (SB 577-B) Page 17